District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

2-1213.01

Technical Assistance Program.

Expired.

History

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-236, § 2 42 DCR 33

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2261.

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 10-236

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 10-236 provided that the act shall expire 3 years after having taken effect. D.C. Law 10-236, which added §§ 1-2261 to 1-2263 §§ 2-1213.01 to 2-1213.03, 2001 Ed., became effective on March 21, 1995.